test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-lex_aigi_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - äšši: # ok
    äšši+N+Sg+Nom:   äšši
    äšši+N+Sg+Gen:   ääši
    äšši+N+Sg+Acc:   ääši
    äšši+N+Sg+Ill:   áášán
    äšši+N+Sg+Loc:   ääšist
    äšši+N+Sg+Com:   aššijn
    äšši+N+Sg+Abe:   äšittáá
    äšši+N+Ess:      äššin
    äšši+N+Par:      äššid
    äšši+N+Pl+Nom:   ääših
    äšši+N+Pl+Gen:  [aašij, ašij]
    äšši+N+Pl+Acc:   aašijd
    äšši+N+Pl+Ill:   aššijd
    äšši+N+Pl+Loc:   aašijn
    äšši+N+Pl+Com:   ašijguin
    äšši+N+Pl+Abe:   ašijttáá


  Noun - täsni: # ok  i/á
    täsni+N+Sg+Nom:   täsni
    täsni+N+Sg+Gen:   tääsni
    täsni+N+Sg+Acc:   tääsni
    täsni+N+Sg+Ill:   táásnán
    täsni+N+Sg+Loc:   tääsnist
    täsni+N+Sg+Com:   tasnijn
    täsni+N+Sg+Abe:   täsnittáá
    täsni+N+Ess:      täsnin
    täsni+N+Par:      täsnid
    täsni+N+Pl+Nom:   tääsnih
    täsni+N+Pl+Gen:  [taasnij, tasnij]
    täsni+N+Pl+Acc:   taasnijd
    täsni+N+Pl+Ill:   tasnijd
    täsni+N+Pl+Loc:   taasnijn
    täsni+N+Pl+Com:   tasnijguin
    täsni+N+Pl+Abe:   tasnijttáá


  Noun - jävri: # ok AIGI i/á
    jävri+N+Sg+Nom:   jävri
    jävri+N+Sg+Gen:   jäävri
    jävri+N+Sg+Acc:   jäävri
    jävri+N+Sg+Ill:   jáávrán 
    jävri+N+Sg+Loc:   jäävrist
    jävri+N+Sg+Com:   javrijn
    jävri+N+Sg+Abe:   jävrittáá
    jävri+N+Ess:      jävrin
    jävri+N+Par:      jävrid
    jävri+N+Pl+Nom:   jäävrih
    jävri+N+Pl+Gen:  [jaavrij, javrij]
    jävri+N+Pl+Acc:   jaavrijd
    jävri+N+Pl+Ill:   javrijd
    jävri+N+Pl+Loc:   jaavrijn
    jävri+N+Pl+Com:   javrijguin
    jävri+N+Pl+Abe:   javrijttáá

  Noun - njälmi: # ok AIGI i/á
    njälmi+N+Sg+Nom:   njälmi
    njälmi+N+Sg+Gen:   njäälmi
    njälmi+N+Sg+Acc:   njäälmi
    njälmi+N+Sg+Ill:   njáálmán
    njälmi+N+Sg+Loc:   njäälmist
    njälmi+N+Sg+Com:   njalmijn
    njälmi+N+Sg+Abe:   njälmittáá
    njälmi+N+Ess:      njälmin
    njälmi+N+Pl+Nom:   njäälmih
    njälmi+N+Pl+Gen:  [njaalmij, njalmij]
    njälmi+N+Pl+Acc:   njaalmijd
    njälmi+N+Pl+Ill:   njalmijd
    njälmi+N+Pl+Loc:   njaalmijn
    njälmi+N+Pl+Com:   njalmijguin
    njälmi+N+Pl+Abe:   njalmijttáá

  Noun - eeči: # ok
    eeči+N+Sg+Nom:   eeči
    eeči+N+Sg+Gen:   eeji
    eeči+N+Sg+Acc:   eeji
    eeči+N+Sg+Ill:   iäčán
    eeči+N+Sg+Loc:   eejist
    eeči+N+Sg+Com:   eijijn
    eeči+N+Sg+Abe:   ejittáá
    eeči+N+Ess:      eeččin
    eeči+N+Par:      eeččid
    eeči+N+Pl+Nom:   eejih
    eeči+N+Pl+Gen:  [eejij, ejij]
    eeči+N+Pl+Acc:   eejijd
    eeči+N+Pl+Ill:   eijijd
    eeči+N+Pl+Loc:   eejijn
    eeči+N+Pl+Com:   ejijguin
    eeči+N+Pl+Abe:   ejijttáá

  Noun - lähji: # ok AIGI i/á
    lähji+N+Sg+Nom:   lähji
    lähji+N+Sg+Gen:   läähji
    lähji+N+Sg+Acc:   läähji
    lähji+N+Sg+Ill:   lááhján
    lähji+N+Sg+Loc:   läähjist
    lähji+N+Sg+Com:   lahjijn
    lähji+N+Sg+Abe:   lähjittáá
    lähji+N+Ess:      lähjin
    lähji+N+Par:      lähjid
    lähji+N+Pl+Nom:   läähjih
    lähji+N+Pl+Gen:  [laahjij, lahjij]
    lähji+N+Pl+Acc:   laahjijd
    lähji+N+Pl+Ill:   lahjijd
    lähji+N+Pl+Loc:   laahjijn
    lähji+N+Pl+Com:   lahjijguin
    lähji+N+Pl+Abe:   lahjijttáá

  Noun - säppi: # ok AIGI i/á
    säppi+N+Sg+Nom:   säppi
    säppi+N+Sg+Gen:   sääpi
    säppi+N+Sg+Acc:   sääpi
    säppi+N+Sg+Ill:   sáápán
    säppi+N+Sg+Loc:   sääpist
    säppi+N+Sg+Com:   sappijn
    säppi+N+Sg+Abe:   säpittáá
    säppi+N+Ess:      säppin
    säppi+N+Par:      säppid
    säppi+N+Pl+Nom:   sääpih
    säppi+N+Pl+Gen:  [saapij, sapij]
    säppi+N+Pl+Acc:   saapijd
    säppi+N+Pl+Ill:   sappijd
    säppi+N+Pl+Loc:   saapijn
    säppi+N+Pl+Com:   sapijguin
    säppi+N+Pl+Abe:   sapijttáá

  Noun - välli: # ok AIGI i/á
    välli+N+Sg+Nom:   välli
    välli+N+Sg+Gen:   vääli
    välli+N+Sg+Acc:   vääli
    välli+N+Sg+Ill:   váálán
    välli+N+Sg+Loc:   väälist
    välli+N+Sg+Com:   vallijn
    välli+N+Sg+Abe:   välittáá
    välli+N+Ess:      vällin
    välli+N+Par:      vällid
    välli+N+Pl+Nom:   väälih
    välli+N+Pl+Gen:  [vaalij, valij]
    välli+N+Pl+Acc:   vaalijd
    välli+N+Pl+Ill:   vallijd
    välli+N+Pl+Loc:   vaalijn
    välli+N+Pl+Com:   valijguin
    välli+N+Pl+Abe:   valijttáá

  Noun - päddi: # ok AIGI i/á
    päddi+N+Sg+Nom:   päddi
    päddi+N+Sg+Gen:   päädi
    päddi+N+Sg+Acc:   päädi
    päddi+N+Sg+Ill:   páádán
    päddi+N+Sg+Loc:   päädist
    päddi+N+Sg+Com:   paddijn
    päddi+N+Sg+Abe:   pädittáá
    päddi+N+Ess:      päddin
    päddi+N+Par:      päddid
    päddi+N+Pl+Nom:   päädih
    päddi+N+Pl+Gen:  [paadij, padij]
    päddi+N+Pl+Acc:   paadijd
    päddi+N+Pl+Ill:   paddijd
    päddi+N+Pl+Loc:   paadijn
    päddi+N+Pl+Com:   padijguin
    päddi+N+Pl+Abe:   padijttáá

  Noun - päkki: # ok AIGI WG i/á
    päkki+N+Sg+Nom:   päkki
    päkki+N+Sg+Gen:   päähi
    päkki+N+Sg+Acc:   päähi
    päkki+N+Sg+Ill:   páákán
    päkki+N+Sg+Loc:   päähist
    päkki+N+Sg+Com:   pahhijn
    päkki+N+Sg+Abe:   pähittáá
    päkki+N+Ess:      päkkin
    päkki+N+Par:      päkkid
    päkki+N+Pl+Nom:   päähih
    päkki+N+Pl+Gen:  [paahij, pahij]
    päkki+N+Pl+Acc:   paahijd
    päkki+N+Pl+Ill:   pahhijd
    päkki+N+Pl+Loc:   paahijn
    päkki+N+Pl+Com:   pahijguin
    päkki+N+Pl+Abe:   pahijttáá

  Noun - mätki: # ok AIGI i/á
    mätki+N+Sg+Nom:   mätki
    mätki+N+Sg+Gen:   määđhi
    mätki+N+Sg+Acc:   määđhi
    mätki+N+Sg+Ill:   máátkán
    mätki+N+Sg+Loc:   määđhist
    mätki+N+Sg+Com:   mađhijn
    mätki+N+Sg+Abe:   mäđhittáá
    mätki+N+Ess:      mätkin
    mätki+N+Par:      mätkid
    mätki+N+Pl+Nom:   määđhih
    mätki+N+Pl+Gen:  [maađhij, mađhij]
    mätki+N+Pl+Acc:   maađhijd
    mätki+N+Pl+Ill:   mađhijd
    mätki+N+Pl+Loc:   maađhijn
    mätki+N+Pl+Com:   mađhijguin
    mätki+N+Pl+Abe:   mađhijttáá

  Noun - pähti: # ok AIGI i/á
    pähti+N+Sg+Nom:   pähti
    pähti+N+Sg+Gen:   päävti
    pähti+N+Sg+Acc:   päävti
    pähti+N+Sg+Ill:   pááhtán
    pähti+N+Sg+Loc:   päävtist
    pähti+N+Sg+Com:   pavttijn
    pähti+N+Sg+Abe:   pävtittáá
    pähti+N+Ess:      pähtin
    pähti+N+Par:      pähtid
    pähti+N+Pl+Nom:   päävtih
    pähti+N+Pl+Gen:  [paavtij, pavtij]
    pähti+N+Pl+Acc:   paavtijd
    pähti+N+Pl+Ill:   pavttijd
    pähti+N+Pl+Loc:   paavtijn
    pähti+N+Pl+Com:   pavtijguin
    pähti+N+Pl+Abe:   pavtijttáá

  Noun - tähti: # ok AIGI i/á
    tähti+N+Sg+Nom:   tähti
    tähti+N+Sg+Gen:   täävti
    tähti+N+Sg+Acc:   täävti
    tähti+N+Sg+Ill:   tááhtán
    tähti+N+Sg+Loc:   täävtist
    tähti+N+Sg+Com:   tavttijn
    tähti+N+Sg+Abe:   tävtittáá
    tähti+N+Ess:      tähtin
    tähti+N+Par:      tähtid
    tähti+N+Pl+Nom:   täävtih
    tähti+N+Pl+Gen:  [taavtij, tavtij]
    tähti+N+Pl+Acc:   taavtijd
    tähti+N+Pl+Ill:   tavttijd
    tähti+N+Pl+Loc:   taavtijn
    tähti+N+Pl+Com:   tavtijguin
    tähti+N+Pl+Abe:   tavtijttáá

  Noun - mecci: # ok AIGI i / á
    mecci+N+Sg+Nom:   mecci
    mecci+N+Sg+Gen:   meeci
    mecci+N+Sg+Gen:   meeci
    mecci+N+Sg+Ill:   miäcán # TWOLC: e > iä (Sg Ill)
    mecci+N+Sg+Loc:   meecist
    mecci+N+Sg+Com:   meccijn
    mecci+N+Sg+Abe:   mecittáá
    mecci+N+Ess:      meccin
    mecci+N+Par:      meccid
    mecci+N+Pl+Nom:   meecih
    mecci+N+Pl+Gen:  [meecij, mecij]
    mecci+N+Pl+Acc:   meecijd
    mecci+N+Pl+Ill:   meccijd
    mecci+N+Pl+Loc:   meecijn
    mecci+N+Pl+Com:   mecijguin
    mecci+N+Pl+Abe:   mecijttáá

  Noun - leibi: # ok AIGI
    leibi+N+Sg+Nom:   leibi
    leibi+N+Sg+Gen:   leeibi
    leibi+N+Sg+Acc:   leeibi
    leibi+N+Sg+Ill:   liäibán
    leibi+N+Sg+Loc:   leeibist
    leibi+N+Sg+Com:   leibijn
    leibi+N+Sg+Abe:   leibittáá
    leibi+N+Ess:      leibin
    leibi+N+Par:      leibid
    leibi+N+Pl+Nom:   leeibih
    leibi+N+Pl+Gen:  [leeibij, leibij]
    leibi+N+Pl+Acc:   leeibijd
    leibi+N+Pl+Ill:   leibijd
    leibi+N+Pl+Loc:   leeibijn
    leibi+N+Pl+Com:   leibijguin
    leibi+N+Pl+Abe:   leibijttáá

  Noun - seibi: # ok AIGI
    seibi+N+Sg+Nom:   seibi
    seibi+N+Sg+Gen:   seeibi
    seibi+N+Sg+Acc:   seeibi
    seibi+N+Sg+Ill:   siäibán
    seibi+N+Sg+Loc:   seeibist
    seibi+N+Sg+Com:   seibijn
    seibi+N+Sg+Abe:   seibittáá
    seibi+N+Ess:      seibin
    seibi+N+Par:      seibid
    seibi+N+Pl+Nom:   seeibih
    seibi+N+Pl+Gen:  [seeibij, seibij]
    seibi+N+Pl+Acc:   seeibijd
    seibi+N+Pl+Ill:   seibijd
    seibi+N+Pl+Loc:   seeibijn
    seibi+N+Pl+Com:   seibijguin
    seibi+N+Pl+Abe:   seibijttáá

  Noun - käibi: # ok AIGI
    käibi+N+Sg+Nom:   käibi
    käibi+N+Sg+Gen:   kääibi
    käibi+N+Sg+Acc:   kääibi
    käibi+N+Sg+Ill:   kááibán
    käibi+N+Sg+Loc:   kääibist
    käibi+N+Sg+Com:   kaibijn
    käibi+N+Sg+Abe:   käibittáá
    käibi+N+Ess:      käibin
    käibi+N+Par:      käibid
    käibi+N+Pl+Nom:   kääibih
    käibi+N+Pl+Gen:  [kaaibij, kaibij]
    käibi+N+Pl+Acc:   kaaibijd
    käibi+N+Pl+Ill:   kaibijd
    käibi+N+Pl+Loc:   kaaibijn
    käibi+N+Pl+Com:   kaibijguin
    käibi+N+Pl+Abe:   kaibijttáá

  Noun - äigi: # ok AIGI
    äigi+N+Sg+Nom:   äigi
    äigi+N+Sg+Gen:   ääigi
    äigi+N+Sg+Acc:   ääigi
    äigi+N+Sg+Ill:   ááigán
    äigi+N+Sg+Loc:   ääigist
    äigi+N+Sg+Com:   aigijn
    äigi+N+Sg+Abe:   äigittáá
    äigi+N+Ess:      äigin
    äigi+N+Par: äigid
    äigi+N+Pl+Nom:   ääigih
    äigi+N+Pl+Gen:  [aaigij, aigij]
    äigi+N+Pl+Acc:   aaigijd
    äigi+N+Pl+Ill:   aigijd
    äigi+N+Pl+Loc:   aaigijn
    äigi+N+Pl+Com:   aigijguin
    äigi+N+Pl+Abe:   aigijttáá

  Noun - veigi: # ok AIGI
    veigi+N+Sg+Nom:   veigi
    veigi+N+Sg+Gen:   veeigi
    veigi+N+Sg+Acc:   veeigi
    veigi+N+Sg+Ill:   viäigán
    veigi+N+Sg+Loc:   veeigist
    veigi+N+Sg+Com:   veigijn
    veigi+N+Sg+Abe:   veigittáá
    veigi+N+Ess:      veigin
    veigi+N+Par:      veigid
    veigi+N+Pl+Nom:   veeigih
    veigi+N+Pl+Gen:  [veeigij, veigij]
    veigi+N+Pl+Acc:   veeigijd
    veigi+N+Pl+Ill:   veigijd
    veigi+N+Pl+Loc:   veeigijn
    veigi+N+Pl+Com:   veigijguin
    veigi+N+Pl+Abe:   veigijttáá

  Noun - läbži: # ok AIGI
    läbži+N+Sg+Nom:   läbži
    läbži+N+Sg+Gen:   lääbži
    läbži+N+Sg+Acc:   lääbži
    läbži+N+Sg+Ill:   láábžán
    läbži+N+Sg+Loc:   lääbžist
    läbži+N+Sg+Com:   labžijn
    läbži+N+Sg+Abe:   läbžittáá
    läbži+N+Ess:      läbžin
    läbži+N+Par:      läbžid
    läbži+N+Pl+Nom:   lääbžih
    läbži+N+Pl+Gen:  [laabžij, labžij]
    läbži+N+Pl+Acc:   laabžijd
    läbži+N+Pl+Ill:   labžijd
    läbži+N+Pl+Loc:   laabžijn
    läbži+N+Pl+Com:   labžijguin
    läbži+N+Pl+Abe:   labžijttáá

  Noun - äitti: # ok AIGI
    äitti+N+Sg+Nom:   äitti
    äitti+N+Sg+Gen:   ääiti
    äitti+N+Sg+Acc:   ääiti
    äitti+N+Sg+Ill:   ááitán
    äitti+N+Sg+Loc:   ääitist
    äitti+N+Sg+Com:   aittijn
    äitti+N+Sg+Abe:   äitittáá
    äitti+N+Ess:      äittin
    äitti+N+Pl+Nom:   ääitih
    äitti+N+Pl+Gen:  [aaitij, aitij]
    äitti+N+Pl+Acc:   aaitijd
    äitti+N+Pl+Ill:   aittijd
    äitti+N+Pl+Loc:   aaitijn
    äitti+N+Pl+Com:   aitijguin
    äitti+N+Pl+Abe:   aitijttáá

  Noun - sältti: # ok AIGI
    sältti+N+Sg+Nom:   sältti
    sältti+N+Sg+Gen:   säälti
    sältti+N+Sg+Acc:   säälti
    sältti+N+Sg+Ill:   sááltán
    sältti+N+Sg+Loc:   säältist
    sältti+N+Sg+Com:   salttijn
    sältti+N+Sg+Abe:   sältittáá
    sältti+N+Ess:      sälttin
    sältti+N+Par:      sälttid
    sältti+N+Pl+Nom:   säältih
    sältti+N+Pl+Gen:  [saaltij, saltij]
    sältti+N+Pl+Acc:   saaltijd
    sältti+N+Pl+Ill:   salttijd
    sältti+N+Pl+Loc:   saaltijn
    sältti+N+Pl+Com:   saltijguin
    sältti+N+Pl+Abe:   saltijttáá
